Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-780
Department; liability for costs.

The department is not liable
for actual or incidental costs incurred by any person due to departmental
actions in enforcing the Anthrax Control Act unless such costs are clearly
unreasonable or result from the gross or willful negligence of the department
or its employees or agents.

Laws 2009, LB99, § 17.